Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1107
Decision; review by Supreme Court.

Within thirty days after the Court of Appeals has issued its decision in a case, any party to the case may petition the Supreme Court for further review of the decision in the manner prescribed by the rules of the Supreme Court.

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 7.

An opinion of a single judge of the Court of Appeals is not an opinion of the Court of Appeals; thus, this section does not provide the Supreme Court with jurisdiction to review an opinion of a single judge of the Court of Appeals. State v. Chambers, 242 Neb. 124, 493 N.W.2d 328 (1992).